District of Columbia statutes.
6-1312

Presidential approved procedures and guidelines.

The authorities granted to the Secretary pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall be exercised in accordance with procedures and guidelines approved by the President.

Aug. 24, 1982, 96 Stat. 290, Pub. L. 97-241, § 212

History

1981 Ed., § 5-1212.

Prior Codifications

For effective date of amendment made by title II of Pub. L. 97-241, Historical and Statutory Notes following § 6-1301.

Effective Dates